Washington statutes.
RCW 18.39.320

Prearrangement contracts—Annual financial statement—Failure to file.

(1) Each funeral establishment which has prearrangement funeral service contracts outstanding shall annually, as required by the board, file with the board a true and accurate statement of its financial condition and transactions and affairs involving prearrangement funeral service contracts for its preceding fiscal year. The statement shall be on such forms and shall contain such information as required by this chapter and by the board.

(2) The board shall take disciplinary action against the certificate of registration of any funeral establishment which fails to file its annual statement when due or after any extension of time which the board has, for good cause, granted.

[ 1989 c 390 s 8; 1986 c 259 s 71; 1982 c 66 s 10.]

NOTES:

Severability—1986 c 259: See note following RCW 18.130.010.

Effective dates—Transfer of records, files, and pending business—Savings—1982 c 66: See notes following RCW 18.39.240.